West Virginia, session 2025, HB2460.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 28. PRIVATE, PAROCHIAL OR CHURCH SCHOOLS, OR SCHOOLS OF A RELIGIOUS ORDER. §18-28-8. Equal treatment of private and parochial schools for school building construction. (a) Legislative findings. – The Legislature finds that private and parochial schools have recently been treated differently and held to more rigorous restraints than public schools in this state relating to the process of the construction and building of schools. The standards are very different between public schools and private schools for the process of the build of these facilities.  (b) Implementation. – Any state permitting agency, county regulations, or municipality regulations for construction must treat private and parochial schools the same as public schools are treated. This includes, but is not limited to, the following: building permits, fees charged, safety standards, wastewater management, septic systems, the timeliness of permitting processes, and associated build requirements.